California statutes. Vehicle Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 105.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2263.

Shooting practice and instruction in the use of firearms shall constitute part of the training to be given to members of the California Highway Patrol. Firearm training may be given in connection with the school or otherwise and may include participation by patrol members in shooting competition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2264.

The commissioner may procure and issue appropriate badges to patrol members for excellence in marksmanship.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2265.

The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall not assess against any member of the department the cost of replacing any article of uniform clothing or accessories which employees are required to wear when the replacement is necessary as a result of a change in uniform regulations by the department after the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1704.)
-------------------------------------------

2266.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The public safety dispatchers and public safety operators of the Department of the California Highway Patrol are among the lowest paid when compared to operators employed by other law enforcement agencies in the state. The department’s communication centers suffer from significant staff shortages and high turnover rates. Increasing the wages paid to these public safety dispatchers and public safety operators will increase their professionalism while reducing their rate of turnover.

(2) The recruitment and retention problem is especially evident in the
 classifications of Public Safety Dispatcher and Public Safety Operator.

(3) In order for the state to recruit and retain the highest qualified and capable public safety dispatchers and public safety operators, those employees should be compensated in an amount equal to the estimated average total compensation for the classifications corresponding to
 Public Safety Dispatcher and Public Safety Operator within the police departments in the Cities of Los Angeles, Oakland, San Diego, and San Jose and the City and County of San Francisco.

(4) This section is not in violation of the Ralph C. Dills Act (Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code), which requires that changes for salaries and benefits be collectively bargained between representatives of the state and the employee’s union. This section does not circumvent that process. This section simply authorizes the Department of
 Human Resources, when determining compensation for
 public safety dispatchers and public safety operators in the Department of the California Highway Patrol, to consider the total compensation for public safety dispatchers and public safety operators in other jurisdictions.

(b) When determining compensation for public safety dispatchers and public safety operators in the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Human Resources may consider the total compensation for public safety dispatchers and public safety operators in comparable positions in the police departments specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 66, Sec. 1.   (SB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2268.

(a) Any member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, as specified in Sections 2250 and 2250.1, shall be capable of fulfilling the complete range of official duties administered by the commissioner pursuant to Section 2400 and other critical duties that may be necessary for the preservation of life and property. Members of the California Highway Patrol shall not be assigned to permanent limited duty positions which do not require the ability to perform these duties.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any member of the California Highway Patrol who, after sustaining serious job-related physical injuries, returned to duty with the California Highway Patrol and who received a written commitment from the appointing power allowing his or her continued employment as a member of the California Highway Patrol. This subdivision applies only to commitments made prior to January 1, 1984.

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) entitles a member of the California Highway Patrol to, or precludes a member from receiving, an industrial disability retirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 305, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2269.

(a) The commissioner shall provide, as safety equipment, boots to each member of the California Highway Patrol who is assigned to ride motorcycles. This safety equipment shall remain the property of the state. Items lost or damaged because of the negligence of the officer shall be replaced by the officer at his or her expense.

(b) The commissioner shall pay the cost of aviation boots to each member of the California Highway Patrol who is assigned to aircraft operations and shall make aviation boots directly available for purchase by those members.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2267 (as added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 23) by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 168.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers and Duties [2400. - 2429.9.]

2400.

(a) The commissioner shall administer Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 10850) of Division 4, Article 3 (commencing with Section 17300) of Chapter 1 of Division 9, Division 10 (commencing with Section 20000), Division 11 (commencing with Section 21000) except Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 22950), Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000), Division 13 (commencing with Section 29000), Division 14 (commencing with Section 31600), Division 14.1 (commencing with Section 32000), Division 14.5 (commencing with Section 33000), Division 14.7 (commencing with Section 34000), Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500), Division 15 (commencing with Section 35000), Division 16 (commencing with Section 36000) except Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 36100) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 36300), and Division 16.5
 (commencing with Section 38000) except Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 38010).

(b) The commissioner shall enforce all laws regulating the operation of vehicles and the use of the highways except that, on ways or places to which Section 592 makes reference, the commissioner shall not be required to provide patrol or enforce any provisions of this code other than those provisions applicable to private property.

(c) The commissioner shall not be required to provide patrol for or enforce Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000).

(d) The commissioner shall have full responsibility and primary jurisdiction for the administration and enforcement of the laws, and for the investigation of traffic accidents, on all toll highways and state highways constructed as freeways, including transit-related facilities located on
 or along the rights-of-way of those toll highways or freeways, except facilities of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District. However, city police officers while engaged primarily in general law enforcement duties may incidentally enforce state and local traffic laws and ordinances on toll highways and state freeways within incorporated areas of the state. In any city having either a population in excess of 2,000,000 or an area of more than 300 square miles, city police officers shall have full responsibility and primary jurisdiction for the administration and enforcement of those laws and ordinances, unless the city council of the city by resolution requests administration and enforcement of those laws by the commissioner.

(e) The commissioner shall have full responsibility and primary jurisdiction for the administration and enforcement of the laws, and for the investigation of traffic accidents, on all highways within a city and
 county with a population of less than 25,000, if, at the time the city and county government is established, the county contains no municipal corporations.

(f) The commissioner may enter into any interagency agreement with the State Board of Equalization for the purpose of enforcement of statutes requiring commercial vehicles from foreign jurisdictions to have a diesel fuel tax permit and to make payments to the board as required.

(g) The commissioner shall assume those duties and responsibilities of providing protection to state property and employees actually being performed by the California State Police Division on and before July 11, 1995.

(h) Subject
 to the provisions of this subdivision, the commissioner may provide for the physical security of any current or former constitutional officer of the state and their immediate family and current or former legislator of the state and their immediate family.

(1) Upon the request for security services pursuant to this subdivision, the commissioner shall direct a threat analysis to determine the threat level and duration of physical security provided.

(2) The commissioner shall
 reassess the need, level, and duration of security six months from the date the security is first provided pursuant to the determination made in paragraph (1). After the first six-month reassessment, the security may be reassessed as necessary, but no less frequently than annually, to adjust for changing threat levels.

(3) The commissioner shall not alter the level or duration of the security provided under this subdivision until the reassessment required by paragraph (2) is completed.

(4) As used in this subdivision, “immediate family” means any of the following individuals that reside in the primary place of residence of the current or former constitutional officer or legislator requesting security and have any of the following relationships with the current or former constitutional officer:

(A) Spouse or domestic
 partner.

(B) Child, including adopted, step, or recognized natural child.

(C) Parents, including step, in-laws, or adoptive.

(i) Upon request of the Chief Justice of the California Supreme Court, the commissioner may provide appropriate protective services to any current or former member of the State Court of Appeal or the California Supreme Court.

(j) The commissioner shall have full responsibility as the certifying official of the Annual State of California Size and Weight Certification for the enforcement of all state size and weight laws on the federal-aid interstate, primary urban, and secondary systems in accordance with Sections 657.13 and 657.15 of Title 23 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 260, Sec. 3.   (SB 194)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2400.6.

The commissioner shall enforce all laws regulating the operation of vehicles on, and the use of any portion of, State Highway Route 1 in the City of Malibu, if requested by the city, and if a contract is entered into between the state and the city. The contract shall require that an amount be paid to the commissioner that is equal to the costs incurred by the department for services provided under the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2400.7.

(a) The commissioner may enforce all laws regulating the operation of vehicles and on, and the use of, any portion of any expressway in the County of Santa Clara, if requested by a city or the county with respect to the portion of the highway within that city or county and if a contract is entered into between the state and that city or the county or any combination thereof.

(b) The contract shall require affected cities or the County of Santa Clara, or both, as the case may be, to pay to the commissioner, for deposit in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund, an amount that is equal to the costs incurred by the department for services provided under the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 467, Sec. 2.   Effective September 25, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.

The commissioner shall make adequate provision for patrol of the highways at all times of the day and night.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.1.

The commissioner may enforce those provisions relating to the transportation of hazardous waste found in Article 6 (commencing with Section 25160), Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 25167.1), and Article 8 (commencing with Section 25180), of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 25180 of the Health and Safety Code and the provisions relating to the transportation of medical waste found in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 118000) of, and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 118325) of, Part 14 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 423.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2402.

The commissioner may make and enforce such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the duties of the department. Rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, commencing with Section 11370 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1500.)
-------------------------------------------

2402.6.

(a) The commissioner may adopt and enforce regulations and standards with respect to fuel containers and fuel systems on vehicles using compressed or liquefied natural gas and liquefied petroleum gas used in conjunction with a propulsion system certified by the State Air Resources Board as producing as few or fewer emissions as a State Air Resources Board approved system using compressed or liquefied natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas and with respect to the operation of vehicles using any of those fuels to ensure the safety of the equipment and vehicles and of persons and property using the highways. 

(b) The commissioner may also adopt and enforce regulations and standards with respect to fuel containers and fuel systems on vehicles using compressed or liquefied hydrogen gas or liquid fuels that generate hydrogen gas.

(c) All motor vehicles with compressed natural gas fuel systems used for propulsion shall comply either with the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) or with National Fire Protection Administration Standard NFPA 52, “Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) Vehicular Fuel Systems” in effect at the time of manufacture, until standards for those fuel systems have been incorporated into the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards by the United States Department of Transportation. Whenever those Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards include requirements for gaseous fuel systems, all motor vehicles with gaseous fuel systems which are manufactured after the effective date of those requirements shall comply with those requirements.

(d) It is an infraction for any person to operate any motor vehicle in violation of any provision of a regulation adopted pursuant to this section.

(e) The operator of every facility for filling portable liquefied natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas containers having a capacity of four pounds or more but not more than 200 pounds of gas shall post in a conspicuous place the regulations applicable to that filling procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 610, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2402.7.

The commissioner shall adopt the definitions designated by the United States Department of Transportation under Title 49 (commencing with Section 1801) of the United States Code and Title 49 (commencing with Section 107) of the Code of Federal Regulations relating to hazardous materials, substances, or wastes, including, but not limited to, definitions relating to any radioactive material, poison, flammable gas, nonflammable gas, flammable liquid, oxidizer, flammable solid, corrosive material (liquid or solid), irritating materials, combustible liquids, explosives, blasting agents, etiologic agents, organic peroxides, hazardous wastes, and other regulated materials of classes A, B, C, D and E.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 860, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2403.

The commissioner may create highway patrol districts for the efficient administration and enforcement of this code and the laws respecting the use of highways. The commissioner may establish branch offices where necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 106.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2403.5.

The commissioner, or a designated representative, may enter into reciprocal operational agreements with authorized representatives of the Oregon State Police, the Nevada Department of Motor Vehicles and Public Safety, and the Arizona Department of Public Safety to promote expeditious and effective law enforcement service to the public, and assistance between the members of the California Highway Patrol and those agencies, in areas adjacent to the borders of this state and each of the adjoining states pursuant to Section 830.39 of the Penal Code. The reciprocal operational agreement shall be in writing and may cover the reciprocal exchange of law enforcement services, resources, facilities, and any other necessary and proper
 matters between the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the respective agency. Any agreement shall specify the involved departments, divisions, or units of the agencies, the duration and purpose of the agreement, the responsibility for damages, the method of financing any joint or cooperative undertaking, and the methods to be employed to terminate an agreement. The commissioner may establish operational procedures in implementation of any reciprocal operational agreement that are necessary to achieve the purposes of the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 345, Sec. 11.   (AB 2752)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2404.

The commissioner shall establish, in counties having charters, except in counties of the first or second class, headquarters or substations for the efficient performance of the duties of the department, and may establish, in other localities deemed most suitable, headquarters or substations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 107.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2404.5.

The department shall obtain a vehicle suitable for registration and commercial safety inspections at border crossings into Mexico.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 299.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2405.

The commissioner may purchase or lease such real estate and erect such buildings as the department or any of its divisions require, subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

2406.

The commissioner may provide that any highway patrol vehicle shall be equipped with a stretcher and emergency first aid equipment for use in transporting injured persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2407.

The department shall prepare and on request supply to police departments, coroners, sheriffs, and other suitable agencies or individuals, forms for accident reports required under this code, which reports shall call for sufficiently detailed information to disclose with reference to a traffic accident the cause, conditions then existing, and the persons and vehicles involved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2408.

The department shall tabulate and may analyze all accident reports and publish annually or at more frequent intervals statistical information based thereon as to the number and location of traffic accidents, as well as other information relating to traffic accident prevention. Based upon its findings after such analysis, the department may conduct further necessary detailed research to more fully determine the cause and control of highway accidents. It may further conduct experimental field tests within areas of the State to prove the practicability of various ideas advanced in traffic control and accident prevention.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2409.

All members of the California Highway Patrol have the powers of a peace officer as provided in Section 830.2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

2410.

Members of the California Highway Patrol are authorized to direct traffic according to law, and, in the event of a fire or other emergency, or to expedite traffic or insure safety, may direct traffic as conditions may require notwithstanding the provisions of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2410.5.

(a) The department may contract with a person or governmental entity that is conducting a special event which will impose extraordinary traffic control requirements at and near the site of the special event to provide supplemental patrol services to coordinate and direct traffic at and near the special event site. A contract entered into pursuant to this section shall include provisions for reimbursement to the department, and may include a requirement for the posting of a bond, for the cost of providing the supplemental patrol services, as determined by the commissioner.

(b) The patrol services, if any, provided under this section shall be rendered by officers of the department.

(c) Contract patrol services authorized under this section shall not reduce the normal and regular services of the department.

(d) Any contract fees received by the department pursuant to a contract under this section shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 54, Sec. 1.   Effective May 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

2411.

Members of the California Highway Patrol are authorized to serve all warrants relating to the enforcement of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2412.

All members of the California Highway Patrol may investigate accidents resulting in personal injuries or death and gather evidence for the purpose of prosecuting the person or persons guilty of any violation of the law contributing to the happening of such accident.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2413.

(a) The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol is designated as the Statewide Vehicle Theft Investigation and Apprehension Coordinator. The commissioner may establish vehicle theft prevention, investigation, and apprehension programs. The commissioner may assist local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies by coordinating multijurisdictional vehicle theft investigations and may establish programs to improve the ability of law enforcement to combat vehicle theft.

(b) The Department of the California Highway Patrol may retain license plate data captured by a license plate reader (LPR) for no more than 60 days, except in circumstances when the data is
 being used as evidence or for all felonies being investigated, including, but not limited to, auto theft, homicides, kidnaping, burglaries, elder and juvenile abductions, Amber Alerts, and Blue Alerts.

(c) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall not sell LPR data for any purpose and shall not make the data available to an agency that is not a law enforcement agency or an individual who is not a law enforcement officer. The data may be used by a law enforcement agency only for purposes of locating vehicles or persons when either are reasonably suspected of being involved in the commission of a public offense.

(d) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall monitor internal use of the LPR data to prevent unauthorized use.

(e) The Department of the
 California Highway Patrol shall, as a part of the annual automobile theft report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10901, report the LPR practices and usage, including the number of LPR data disclosures, a record of the agencies to which data was disclosed and for what purpose, and any changes in policy that affect privacy concerns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 38, Sec. 6.   (AB 115)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2414.

When lost, stolen, abandoned or otherwise unclaimed property, except vehicles subject to registration under this code, comes into possession of the department, the department may hold or store the same with some responsible person until it is claimed and all just and reasonable charges for saving and storage thereof have been paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2415.

(a) If the owner or other person entitled to the possession thereof fails to claim the property within six months and pay the charges, the department may sell it to the highest bidder at public auction at the place where the same may be held or stored, having first caused notice of sale to be given at least five days before the time fixed therefor, by publication once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county where the sale is to be held.

(b) Any excess in the proceeds of the sale after paying such charges and expenses of sale including but not limited to the costs of advertising and a fee of not exceeding ten dollars ($10) to be charged by the department for making the sale shall be deposited in the State Treasury in the special deposit fund as money remaining unclaimed in the hands of the department.

(c) On payment of the price bid for the property sold, the delivery of the property with the commissioner’s bill of sale vests title in the purchaser.

(d) In any case where there is no bid offered for the property, or if the highest bid offered does not exceed the charges for saving, holding, and storage and the expenses of sale, the same shall become the property of the department as compensation for expenses incurred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2416.

(a) The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol may issue authorized emergency vehicle permits only for the following vehicles, and then only upon a finding in each case that the vehicle is used in responding to emergency calls for fire or law enforcement, the immediate preservation of life or property, or the apprehension of law violators:

(1) Any vehicle maintained in whole or in part by the state, a city, a county, or a city and county, and privately owned and operated by a marshal, deputy marshal, or person who is a member of, receives salary from, and is regularly employed by, a police department or sheriff’s department, if the state, a city, a county, or a city and county
 does not furnish to that person a publicly owned authorized emergency vehicle.

(2) Any vehicle owned and operated by a public utility, used primarily to accomplish emergency repairs to utility facilities or used primarily by railroad police officers, who are commissioned by the Governor, in the performance of their duties.

(3) Firefighting or rescue equipment designed and operated exclusively as such.

(4) Any vehicle operated by the chief, assistant chief, or one other uniformed person designated by the chief of a fire department organized as provided in the Health and Safety Code or the Government Code or a special act of the Legislature.

(5) Any vehicle of an air pollution control district used to enforce law relating to air pollution from motor vehicles.

(6) Any vehicle operated by the chief of a fire department established on any base of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(7) Any vehicle owned and operated by a fire company organized pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 14825) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) A privately owned ambulance licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 2500).

(9) Any vehicle other than a privately owned
 ambulance used by privately owned ambulance operators exclusively to transport medical supplies, lifesaving equipment, or personnel to the scene of an emergency when a request for medical supplies, lifesaving equipment, or personnel has been made by any person or public agency responsible for providing emergency medical transportation. The vehicle shall display a sign or lettering not less than two and one-half inches in height, in a color providing a sharp contrast to its background, on each side showing the name of the ambulance operator.

(10) Any vehicle owned and operated by an office or department of a city, county, city and county, or district that is designated by an ordinance adopted by the governing body of that local agency as a hazardous materials response team vehicle for response to hazardous materials
 emergencies.

(11) Any vehicle owned by a county, city, or city and county office of emergency services only while that vehicle is being used by a public employee who is employed by the office in responding to any disaster, including, but not limited to, a fire, flood, earthquake, tsunami, or hazardous materials spill.

(b) The commissioner may adopt and enforce regulations to implement this section.

(c) Violation of any regulation adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 152, Sec. 1.   (AB 438)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2417.

(a) The commissioner may suspend or revoke any permit issued for an authorized emergency vehicle under the following conditions:

(1) The vehicle is operated in violation of any of the provisions of this code.

(2) The vehicle is operated in violation of the rules and regulations relating to authorized emergency vehicles as promulgated by the commissioner.

(3) The vehicle is not equipped as required by this code.

(b) The permittee of any authorized emergency vehicle whose permit has been suspended or revoked shall be entitled, upon request, to a hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) When any authorized emergency vehicle permit has been suspended or revoked under provisions of this section, any additional authorized emergency vehicle permit issued in the name of the permittee may be likewise suspended or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

2418.

The department shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations to ensure that all foreign commercial vehicles entering into, and operating within, this state meet those standards already in effect for other commercial vehicles and shall address, but not be limited to, the following concerns:

(a) Vehicle maintenance.

(b) Maximum hours of service for drivers.

(c) Insurance.

(d) Enforcement of criminal, civil, and administrative actions, including, but not limited to, impoundment of vehicles for second or subsequent violations of rules and regulations adopted under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 727, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Pursuant to Sec. 5 of Ch. 727, this addition became operative only if funding was provided in the 1998 Budget Act.)
-------------------------------------------

2418.1.

For purposes of enforcing the provisions of Section 2418, the department and the State Air Resources Board shall, to the maximum extent possible, conduct vehicle safety and emissions inspections at the California-Mexican border crossings. Inspections shall be conducted at the Otay Mesa and Calexico commercial vehicle inspection facilities operated by the department and at other random roadside locations as determined by the department, in consultation with the board. Inspections for safety and emissions shall be consistent with the inspection procedures specified in Title 13 (commencing with Section 2175) of the California Code of Regulations as they pertain to vehicle inspections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 727, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Pursuant to Sec. 5 of Ch. 727, this addition became operative only if funding was provided in the 1998 Budget Act.)
-------------------------------------------

2418.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every emergency ambulance that is operated within this state by any public or private agency, including, but not limited to, any emergency ambulance that is operated by the State of California, any charter or general law city or county, or any district, shall be equipped at all times with a resuscitator.

(b) For purposes of this section “emergency ambulance” means a vehicle that is designed or intended to be used in providing emergency transportation of wounded, injured, sick, disabled, or incapacitated human beings.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a “resuscitator” means a device that adequately, effectively and safely restores breathing, including, but not limited to, a portable hand-operated, self-refilling bag-valve mask unit for inflation of the lungs with either air or oxygen. The resuscitator shall not have any straps that could be used to attach the resuscitator to the human head.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 404, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2419.

(a) Any member of the California Highway Patrol may give flares to any person as replacement for flares used by such person to warn traffic of an accident or other hazardous condition on a highway, provided such person was not required by law to give such warning, or was not involved in the accident or the creation of the hazardous condition. The officer shall not replace such flares unless he is reasonably satisfied that such person in fact placed the flares for which replacement is requested.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the person requesting replacement of flares shall not be required to file any claim for such flares.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 167.)
-------------------------------------------

2420.

Upon request of the California Highway Patrol, manufacturers of motorcycles shall furnish a certification of gross brake horsepower to the department. If any manufacturer of motorcycles fails to comply with such request within 30 days from the date such request has been deposited in the mail, then and in that event no dealer shall sell or offer for sale the particular make and model of motocycle for which the certification was requested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 422.)
-------------------------------------------

2420.5.

(a) The department may enter into a contract to conduct an inspection of vehicles that are subject to Section 500.100 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations and issue the vehicle inspection sticker authorized under subdivision (b) of that section to qualified vehicles.

(b) Any contract entered into under subdivision (a) shall provide that the amount to be paid to the department shall be equal to the costs incurred by the department for services provided under the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2421.

Notwithstanding Section 11032 of the Government Code, the commissioner may approve the out-of-state travel within the United States of members of the California Highway Patrol, in numbers the commissioner deems appropriate, to attend out-of-state funerals of law enforcement officers or to attend out-of-state events related to the funerals of law enforcement officers, including the National Peace Officers Memorial. Reimbursement for actual and necessary traveling expenses shall be allowed for members of the California Highway Patrol approved to travel out of state pursuant to this section up to a maximum aggregate amount of forty thousand dollars ($40,000) in any fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2421.5.

(a) When any Service Authority for Freeway Emergencies has imposed additional fees on vehicles pursuant to Section 2555 of the Streets and Highways Code, the authority may contract with the department or a private or public entity to handle calls originating from the authority’s motorist aid call box system.

(b) (1) If the contract is with the department, its terms shall comply with the requirements specified in paragraph (2) for the system on the portions of the California Freeway and Expressway System and on county roads in rural, unincorporated areas of the county and on state highway routes that connect segments of these systems, if they are located within the county in which the authority is established and the Department of the California Highway Patrol has law enforcement responsibility over them.

(2) The contract shall contain guidelines, as jointly agreed to between the authority and the department, following consultation with the authority, for services to be provided, including, but not limited to, reporting requirements, immediate transfer of emergency calls and traffic management information to the department, computer interface capability with the department, performance standards, and coordination with the eligible tow service providers.

(c) If the contract is with a private or public entity, the authority shall ensure that the specifications in the “CHP/Cal Trans Call Box and Motorist Aid Guidelines” are met and coordinate with the department to determine which calls will be transferred to it for response. The authority shall reimburse the department for all costs incurred under this subdivision in accordance with the “CHP/Cal Trans Call Box and Motorist Aid Guidelines.” If an authority has a contract with a private or public entity having a commencement date of July 1, 2003, or prior, the performance standards of those contracts shall remain in effect until modifications are made to the applicable sections of the statewide guidelines.

(d) The authority may contract with the Department of the California Highway Patrol to perform duties as mutually agreed by the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 374, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2422.

The department shall determine and implement the basic level of emergency medical dispatcher training for dispatchers employed by the department based on guidelines developed by the Emergency Medical Services Authority with the concurrence of the department. The commissioner may adopt a higher level of training for department dispatchers where appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 70, Sec. 3.   (AB 2038)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2423.
